src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON CIELGI !!= * __@CODE@__ to CAACI
+Attr: flagK ;
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;               ! čääci
+Sg+Gen:^WG flagK ;     ! čääsi
+Sg+Acc:^WG flagK ;     ! čääsi
+Sg+Ill:^EA%>n flagK ;      ! čáácán
+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st flagK ; ! čääsist
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN^RVSH%>in flagK ; ! čassijn
+Sg+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ttáá flagK ;     ! čäsittáá 
+Ess:^CLEN%>n flagK ;               ! čääccin
!+Par:^CLEN%>d flagK ;               ! čääccid 
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON SAAMI-plc
@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:@U.Cap.Obl@ X_SAAMI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON SAAMI-obj-pl
@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:@U.Cap.Obl@ X_SAAMI_PL ;


!LEXICON LUOBAL-mal !!= * __@CODE@__ Similar to VEESKIR
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: LUOBAL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:^WG^RLEN flagK ;	! veeskir


LEXICON LUOBAL-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ Similar to VEESKIR
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LUOBAL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON LUOBAL !!= __@CODE@__ Similar to VEESKIR
+Attr:^WG^RLEN flagK ;	! veeskir
+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN flagK ;	! veeskir
+Sg+Gen: flagK ;     			! viäskár máállás^ÁI
+Sg+Acc: flagK ;    			 ! viäskár
+Sg+Ill:%>ân flagK ; 			! viäskárân
+Sg+Loc:%>ist flagK ; ! viäskárist
+Sg+Com:%>áin flagK ; ! viäskáráin
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá flagK ; ! viäskárttáá
+Ess:^WG^RVSH%>in flagK ;   ! veskirin 
+Ess:%>in flagK ;   ! viäskárin 
+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RLEN%> RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen: RProp ; 
PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON LUOBBALEH-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ Plural to LUOBAL-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LUOBBALEH ;

LEXICON LUOBBALEH-org !!= * __@CODE@__ Plural to LUOBAL-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: LUOBBALEH ;

LEXICON LUOBBALEH-ani !!= * __@CODE@__ Plural to LUOBAL-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: LUOBBALEH ;


LEXICON LUOBBALEH !!= * __@CODE@__ plural forms 
+Pl+Nom:%>eh flagK ;  ! viäskáreh
+Pl+Gen:%>ij flagK ;  ! viäskárij
+Pl+Acc:%>ijd flagK ; ! viäskárijd
+Pl+Ill:%>áid flagK ; ! viäskáráid
+Pl+Loc:%>ijn flagK ; ! viäskárijn
+Pl+Com:%>ijguin flagK ;  ! viäskárijguin
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>ijgijn flagK ;  ! viäskárijguin
+Pl+Abe:%>ijttáá flagK ;  ! viäskárijttáá
+Cmp/PlNom:%>eh RProp ; 


LEXICON JUUHA-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to JUUHA
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: JUUHA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON JUUHA !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to JUUHA, stem ju
+Attr:v flagK ; ! Čivtjuv, stem ju + v
+Attr+Use/NG:uh^RCâ flagK ; ! Čivtjuhâ  ! kiehâ
+Sg+Nom:uh^RCâ flagK ;				 		! kiehâ
+Sg+Gen:uh^RCâ^WG flagK ;     				! kievâ
+Sg+Acc:uh^RCâ^WG flagK ;     				! kievâ
+Sg+Ill:uh^RCâ%>n flagK ;					! kiehân
+Sg+Loc:uh^RCâ^WG%>st flagK ; 				! kievâst
+Sg+Abe:uh^RCâ^WG^RVSH%>ttáá flagK ;		! kievâttáá
+Sg+Com:uh^RCâ^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>in flagK ; ! kievváin
+Ess:uh^RCâ^CLEN%>n flagK ;						! kiehân 
!+Par:uh^RCâ%>d flagK ;						! kiehâd 
+Cmp/SgNom:uh^RCâ%> RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:uh^RCâ^WG%> RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:uh^RCâ^WG%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


!LEXICON JOOVSEP-mal !!= * __@CODE@__.  
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: JOOVSEP ;
!!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;
!
!LEXICON JOOVSEP-fem !!= * __@CODE@__.  
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: JOOVSEP ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;
!
!
!LEXICON JOOVSEP  !!= * __@CODE@__ 
!+Sg+Nom: flagK ;        		   		! Joovsep
!+Attr: flagK ;        		   		! Joovsep
!+Sg+Gen: flagK ;    		 			! Joovsep
!+Sg+Acc: flagK ;     		 			! Joovsep 
!+Sg+Ill:^CSH^SVSH%>ân flagK ;		! Joovsepân
!+Sg+Loc:^CSH^SVSH%>ist flagK ; 		! Joovsepist 
!+Sg+Com:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>áin flagK ;		! Joovseppáin
!+Ess:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>in flagK ; 			! potákkin 
!+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
!+Cmp/SgGen: RProp ; 
!PERSNAME-CMPflag ;

LEXICON MAARIT-fem  !!= * __@CODE@ similar to 3POTTAAK__ 
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: MAARIT ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

LEXICON MAARIT-mal  !!= * __@CODE@ similar to 3POTTAAK__ 
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: MAARIT ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;


LEXICON MAARIT  !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;        		   		! Maarit
+Attr: flagK ;        		   			! Maarit
+Sg+Gen: flagK ;    		 			! Maarit
+Sg+Acc: flagK ;     		 			! Maarit 
+Sg+Ill:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>ân flagK ;		! Marittân
+Sg+Loc:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>ist flagK ; 		! Marittist 
+Sg+Com:^SC^CSH^SVSH%>áin flagK ;		! Marittáin
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^RVSH%> RProp ; 
PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


!LEXICON UCJUV-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to 
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: UCJUV ;
!
!
!LEXICON UCJUV  !!= * __@CODE@__ 
!+Attr: flagK ;
!+Sg+Nom:v flagK ;        		   		! Ucjuv
!+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:hâ flagK ;        		   		! Ucjuuhâ
!+Sg+Gen:v flagK ;    		 			! Ucjuv
!+Sg+Acc:v flagK ;     		 			! Ucjuv 
!+Sg+Ill:^SV^SLEN%>hân flagK ;		! Ucjuuhân
!+Sg+Loc:^SVv^SLEN%>âst flagK ; 		! Ucjuuvâst 
!+Sg+Com:^SCv^SVSH%>áin flagK ;		!  
!+Cmp/SgNom:v RProp ; 
!+Cmp/SgGen:v RProp ; 
!+Cmp/SgGen:v PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


!LEXICON VUONA-mal !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGA
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: VUONA ;
!!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Allegro:^FVD # ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:^FVD^CSH flagK ; !Jovn
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> BEL ;

LEXICON VUONA-fem !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGA
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: VUONA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen+Allegro:^FVD # ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> BEL ;

LEXICON VUONA-obj !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGA
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: VUONA ;

!LEXICON VUONA-org !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGA
!+N+Prop+Sem/Org: VUONA ;

!LEXICON VUONA-ani !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGA
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: VUONA ;


LEXICON VUONA-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGA
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: VUONA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON VUONA !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGA
+Sg+Nom: K;				 		!  
+Attr: K;				 		!  
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN flagK ;     		! soolâ
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN flagK ;     		! soolâ
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n flagK ;		! soolân
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st flagK ; 		! soolâst
+Sg+Com:^WG^SVLOW%>in  flagK ;	! 
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá flagK ;		! solâttáá
+Ess:%>n flagK ;						! algân
!+Par:%>d flagK ;						! algâd
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> RProp ;
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON VUONA_PL-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: VUONA_PL ;

LEXICON VUONA_PL !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGA_PL X_PUUVSAH
+Pl+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>h flagK ;  		! puuvsah
+Pl+Gen:^WG^RLEN%>i flagK ;			! puuvsâi 
+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:^WG%>i flagK ;  		! puvsâi
+Pl+Acc:^WG^RLEN%>id flagK ; 		! puuvsâid
+Pl+Ill:^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>id flagK ; ! puvssáid
+Pl+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>in flagK ; 		! puuvsâin
+Pl+Com:^WG%>iguin flagK ;		! puvsâiguin
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:^WG%>igijn flagK ;		! 
+Pl+Abe:^WG%>ittáá flagK ;		! puvsâittáá
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 

LEXICON PAALGIS-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: PAALGIS ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON PAALGIS  !!= __@CODE@__ similar to KAARBIS
+Attr:^WG^RLEN flagK ;  ! käärbis
+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN flagK ;  ! käärbis
+Sg+Gen:^FCD flagK ;  			 	! kárbá
+Sg+Acc:^FCD flagK ;   				! kárbá
+Sg+Ill:^FCD%>s   flagK ;       		! kárbás
+Sg+Loc:^FCD%>st flagK ;       	 	! kárbást
+Sg+Com:^FCD%>in flagK ; 				! kárbáin
+Sg+Abe:^FCD^RVSH%>ttáá flagK ;   ! kárbáttáá
+Sg+Abe:^FCD^WG%>ttáá flagK ;   ! riäggáttáá
+Ess:^WG^RVSH%>in flagK ;  ! kärbisin
!+Par:^WG^RVSH%>id flagK ;  ! kärbisid

LEXICON Prop_h_PL-plc !!= __@CODE@__  gives %>h etc. to vowel stems
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: Prop_h_PL ;

LEXICON Prop_h_PL !!= __@CODE@__  gives %>h etc. to vowel stems
+Pl+Nom:%>h flagK ; 		! 
+Pl+Gen:%>i flagK ; 		! 
+Pl+Acc:%>id flagK ; 		! 
+Pl+Ill:%>id flagK ; 		! 
+Pl+Loc:%>in flagK ;		! 


LEXICON SAVO-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGA
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: SAVO ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON SAVO !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGA
+Sg+Nom:^FCD^WG K; ! savo DAHJE
+Sg+Nom:^SLEN K;	! savvoon
+Attr:^FCD^WG K;				 		!  
+Sg+Gen:^SLEN flagK ;     		! savvoon
+Sg+Acc:^SLEN flagK ;     		! savvoon
+Sg+Ill:^WG%>ân flagK ;		! savonân
+Sg+Loc:^WG%>ist flagK ; 		! savonist
+Sg+Com:^WG%>áin  flagK ;	! savonáin
+Sg+Abe:^SLEN%>ttáá flagK ;		! savvoonttáá
+Ess:^WG%>n flagK ;						! savonin
!+Par:^WG%>d flagK ;						! savonid
+Cmp/SgNom:^FCD^WG RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^SLEN%> RProp ;
+Cmp/SgGen:^SLEN%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON ANDARAS-mal !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to KUNAGAS
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ANDARAS ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:^FCD%> BEL ;

LEXICON ANDARAS-org !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to KUNAGAS
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: ANDARAS ;

!LEXICON ANDARAS-ani !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to KUNAGAS
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: ANDARAS ;

!LEXICON ANDARAS-fem   * __@CODE@__ similar to KUNAGAS
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ANDARAS ;

LEXICON ANDARAS-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to KUNAGAS
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ANDARAS ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON ANDARAS !!= * __@CODE@__  this is for loanwords without stem change, 3-syll. cons end
+Sg+Nom:^FCD flagK ;				! kunâgâs
+Attr:^FCD flagK ;				! kunâgâs
+Sg+Gen:^FCD flagK ; 				! kunâgâs
+Sg+Acc:^FCD flagK ; 				! kunâgâs
+Sg+Ill:^FCD%>ân flagK ; 			! kunâgâsân 
+Sg+Loc:^FCD%>âst flagK ; 		! kunâgâsâst
+Sg+Com:%>áin flagK ;	 		! kunâgâssáin
+Sg+Abe:^FCD%>ttáá flagK ; 		! kunâgâsttáá
+Ess:%>ân flagK ; 			! kunâgâssân
!+Par:%>âd flagK ;				! kunâgâssâd
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^FCD%> RProp ;
+Cmp/SgGen:^FCD%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON LUOHTA-plc !!= * __@CODE@__   
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LUOHTA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON LUOHTA-mal !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: LUOHTA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: LUOHTA ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> BEL ;

LEXICON LUOHTA-fem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: LUOHTA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>in: LUOHTA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> BEL ;

LEXICON LUOHTA-ani
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: LUOHTA ;

LEXICON LUOHTA-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: LUOHTA ;

LEXICON LUOHTA-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: LUOHTA ;


LEXICON LUOHTA !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to VADDU
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;               ! váddu 
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN flagK ;     ! váádu
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN flagK ;     ! váádu
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n flagK ;      ! váádun
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st flagK ; ! váádust
+Sg+Com: flagK ; ! váddoin 
+Sg+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ttáá flagK ;     ! váduttáá 
+Ess:%>n flagK ;               ! váddun
!+Par:%>d flagK ;               ! váddud 
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON LAADUH-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ Plural to LUOHTA-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LAADUH ;


LEXICON LAADUH !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+Pl+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>h flagK ;  ! vááduh
+Pl+Gen:^WG^RLEN%>i flagK ;  ! váádui
+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:^WG^RVSH%>i flagK ;  ! vádui
+Pl+Acc:^WG^RLEN%>id flagK ; ! vááduid
+Pl+Ill:^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>id flagK ; ! váddoid  
+Pl+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>in flagK ; ! vááduin
+Pl+Com:^WG^RVSH%>iguin flagK ;    ! váduiguin 
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:^WG^RVSH%>igijn flagK ;    ! váduiguin 
+Pl+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ittáá flagK ;    ! váduittáá  
+Cmp/PlNom:^WG^RLEN%>h RProp ; 


LEXICON MOKKE-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGE 
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: MOKKE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON MOKKE-sur !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGE 
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: MOKKE ;

LEXICON MOKKE-org !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGE 
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: MOKKE ;

LEXICON MOKKE-fem !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGE 
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: MOKKE ;

LEXICON MOKKE-mal !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGE 
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: MOKKE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> BEL ;

LEXICON MOKKE-ani !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGE 
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: MOKKE ;
